Utah statutes.
10-9a-104.   Stricter requirements.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a municipality may enact an
ordinance imposing stricter requirements or higher standards than are required
by this chapter.
(2)  A municipality may not impose stricter requirements or higher standards
than are required by:
(a)  Section 10-9a-305;
(b)  Section 10-9a-514;
(c)  Section 10-9a-516; and
(d)  Section 10-9a-520.
